Illinois, session 104th, HB3502.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 19356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 20356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, 356z.77, and 356z.80 21of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 22must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 23370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance   HB3502- 2 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 2coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 3Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 4Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 5Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 6enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 7Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 8other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 9Department of Central Management Services.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 19eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 248-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   HB3502- 3 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)5    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 6including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 7of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 8coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 9benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 10health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 11under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 12356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 13356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 14356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 15356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 16356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 17356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 18356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 19The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 20356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 22Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 23provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 24the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII,   HB3502- 4 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 2rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 3every provision of this Section. 4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 121-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 13eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 14102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 151-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 16eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 187-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 19eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 20revised 11-26-24.) 21    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)24    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a   HB3502- 5 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 2self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 3coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 4coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 7356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 8356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 9356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 10356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 11356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 13356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, 14and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 15comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the 16Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 17enforce the requirements of this Section. The requirement that 18health benefits be covered as provided in this is an exclusive 19power and function of the State and is a denial and limitation 20under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois 21Constitution. A home rule municipality to which this Section 22applies must comply with every provision of this Section. 23    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 24any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 25with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 26Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   HB3502- 6 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 81-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 12eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1510-22.3f as follows: 16    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)17    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 18protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 19post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 20policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 21the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 22356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 23356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 24356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32,   HB3502- 7 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 2356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 3356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 4356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 5Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 6356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 7comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois 8Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 9requirements of this Section. 10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 20102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 211-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 23103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 247-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, 25eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)   HB3502- 8 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 2adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)4    Sec. 356z.80. Retainers and night guards. 5    (a) A group or individual policy of accident and health 6insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 7issued, or renewed after January 1, 2026 shall provide 8coverage for one pair of custom-made retainers and one night 9guard every 2 years for each family covered by the policy.10    (b) As used in this Section:11    "Night guard" means a removable dental device that 12prevents teeth from grinding and clenching while the wearer 13sleeps.14    "Retainer" means a custom-made device worn in the mouth 15over a person's teeth, typically worn to keep teeth in a new, 16correct position or to assist in realignment of teeth. 17    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 18amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 19    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)20    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)21    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 22    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 23the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140,   HB3502- 9 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 2152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 3155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 4356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 5356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 6356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 7356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 8356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 9356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 10356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 11356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 12356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 13356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 14356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 15356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 16368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 17408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 18subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 19XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 20Illinois Insurance Code.21    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 22for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 23Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 24are deemed to be "domestic companies":25        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 26    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;  HB3502- 10 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 2    State; or3        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 4    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 5    of this State, except a corporation subject to 6    substantially the same requirements in its state of 7    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 8    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.9    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 10acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 11pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,12        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 13    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 14    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 15    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 16    acquisition of control takes effect;17        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 18    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 19    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 20    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 21    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 22    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 23    other acquisition of control;24        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 25    following information:26            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the   HB3502- 11 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 2        Organization sought to be acquired;3            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 4        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 5        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 6        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 7        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 8        forma financial statements reflecting projected 9        combined operation for a period of 2 years;10            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 11        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 12        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 13        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and14            (D) such other information as the Director shall 15        require.16    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 17Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 18any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 19enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 20maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 21to its health care certificates).22    (e) In considering any management contract or service 23agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 24Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 25specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 26take into account the effect of the management contract or   HB3502- 12 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 2and the financial condition of the health maintenance 3organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 4into account the effect of the management contract or service 5agreement on competition.6    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 7Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 8Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 9defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 10Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 11group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 12additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:13        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 14    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 15    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 16    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 17    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 18    not be less than one year); and19        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 20    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 21    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 22    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 23    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 24    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 25    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 26    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and   HB3502- 13 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 2    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 3    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 4    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 5    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 6    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 7    plan years.8    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 9statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 10describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 11and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 12the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 13to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 14profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 15unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 16or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 17experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 18the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 19enrollment unit.20    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 21Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 22contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 23refund authorized under this Section.24    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 25if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 26accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative   HB3502- 14 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 2Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 3adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 4(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 5102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 61-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 7eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 8102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 91-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 10eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 126-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 13eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 14103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 151-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 16eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 17103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 181-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 19    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)20    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 21    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 22the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 23141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 24152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 25155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g,   HB3502- 15 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 2356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 3356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 4356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 5356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 6356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 7356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 8356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 9356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 10356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 11356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 12356z.77, 356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 13368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 14403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 15of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 16XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 17Illinois Insurance Code.18    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 19for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 20Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 21are deemed to be "domestic companies":22        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 23    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;24        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 25    State; or26        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another   HB3502- 16 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 2    of this State, except a corporation subject to 3    substantially the same requirements in its state of 4    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 5    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.6    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 7acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 8pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,9        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 10    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 11    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 12    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 13    acquisition of control takes effect;14        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 15    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 16    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 17    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 18    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 19    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 20    other acquisition of control;21        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 22    following information:23            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 24        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 25        Organization sought to be acquired;26            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the   HB3502- 17 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 2        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 3        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 4        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 5        forma financial statements reflecting projected 6        combined operation for a period of 2 years;7            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 8        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 9        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 10        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and11            (D) such other information as the Director shall 12        require.13    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 14Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 15any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 16enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 17maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 18to its health care certificates).19    (e) In considering any management contract or service 20agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 21Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 22specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 23take into account the effect of the management contract or 24service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 25and the financial condition of the health maintenance 26organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take   HB3502- 18 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1into account the effect of the management contract or service 2agreement on competition.3    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 4Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 5Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 6defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 7Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 8group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 9additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:10        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 11    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 12    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 13    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 14    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 15    not be less than one year); and16        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 17    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 18    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 19    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 20    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 21    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 22    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 23    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 24    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 25    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 26    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and   HB3502- 19 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 2    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 3    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 4    plan years.5    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 6statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 7describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 8and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 9the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 10to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 11profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 12unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 13or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 14experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 15the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 16enrollment unit.17    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 18Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 19contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 20refund authorized under this Section.21    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 22if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 23accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 24Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 25Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 26adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized.   HB3502- 20 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 2102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 31-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 4eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 5102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 61-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 7eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 8103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 96-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 10eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 11103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 121-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 13eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 14103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 151-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 1611-26-24.) 17    Section 35. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 18amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 19    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)20    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 21health service organizations shall be subject to the 22provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 23141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 24154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c,   HB3502- 21 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 2356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 3356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 4356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 5356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.80, 364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1, 6402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 7Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 8XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 9shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 10that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 11Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 12Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 13organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 14domestic companies:15        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or16        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 17    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 18    of this State, except a corporation subject to 19    substantially the same requirements in its state of 20    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 21    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.22(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 23102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 241-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 25eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 26102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff.   HB3502- 22 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b11-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 2eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 3103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 47-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 5eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 6    Section 40. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 7amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 8    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)9    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 10services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 11or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 12Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 13143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 14355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 15356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 16356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 17356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18, 18356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 19356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.46, 20356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 21356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 22356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.80, 364.01, 364.3, 23367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 24and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois   HB3502- 23 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1Insurance Code.2    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 3any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 4with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 5Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 6Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 7whatever reason, is unauthorized. 8(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 9102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 1010-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 11eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 12102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 131-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 14eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 15103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 161-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 17eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 18103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 191-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 20    Section 45. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 21changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 22    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)23    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 24assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care   HB3502- 24 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b1benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 2health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 3under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 4356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 5356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 6and 356z.67, and 356z.71, 356z.75, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 7Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the provisions of Sections 8356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the 9Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be subject to the 10provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of the Network 11Adequacy and Transparency Act.12    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 13the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 14Code. 15    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 16rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 17any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 18of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 19with Section 5-5e. 20    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 21Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 22ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 23post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 24no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 25(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 26102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-530, eff.   HB3502- 25 -LRB104 09424 BAB 19484 b11-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, 2eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 3102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 41-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, 5eff. 1-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 6revised 11-26-24.) 7    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 8changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 9that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 10represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 11not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 12made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 13Public Act.